Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-823
Temporary injunction; where brought; hearing; restraining order; issuance; inventory; rights of owner of property.

The action provided for in section 28-821 shall be brought in the district court of the county in which the act of nuisance is being conducted. After filing of the petition, application for a temporary injunction may be made to the district court or judge thereof who shall grant a hearing within ten calendar days after the filing.

When such application for temporary injunction is made, the court or judge thereof may, on application of the complainant, issue a restraining order as otherwise provided for in sections 25-1062 to 25-1080, restraining the defendant and all other persons from removing or in any manner interfering with the personal property and contents of the place where such nuisance is being conducted until the decision of the court or judge granting or refusing such temporary injunction and until the further order of the court thereon. The officers serving such restraining order shall forthwith make and return into court an inventory of the personal property and contents situated in and used in conducting or maintaining such nuisance and further violations of sections 28-807 to 28-829. The owner of any real or personal property closed or restrained or to be closed or restrained may appear between the filing of the complaint and the hearing on the application for permanent injunction, and upon payment of all costs incurred and upon the filing of a bond by the owner of the real property with sureties to be approved by the clerk of the district court in the full value of the property to be ascertained by the court, conditioned that such owner will immediately abate the nuisance and prevent the same from being established or kept until the decision of the court is rendered on the application for a permanent injunction, and the court, if satisfied with the good faith of the owner of the real property and of innocence on the part of the owner of the personal property of any knowledge of the use of such personal property as a nuisance and that, with reasonable care and diligence, such owner could not have known thereof, shall deliver such real or personal property, or both, to the respective owners thereof, and discharge or refrain from issuing at the time of the hearing on the application for the temporary injunction any order closing such real property or restraining the removal or interference with such personal property. The release of any real or personal property under this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subjected. In no event shall any work, material, conduct or live performance not adjudicated to be obscene under sections 28-807 to 28-829 be enjoined.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 179.